Arkansas, session 2025, HB1088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Finance and Administration - Child Support Enforcement for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N034N DFA OCSE ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) D005N DFA IT TECHNICAL SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT11
(3) D002C DFA OIS ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IT10
(4) A003C DFA REVENUE ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS14
*JAP005*
01/07/2025 10:59:04 AM JAP005

HB1088
(5) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(6) G225C DFA OCSE FIELD OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS13
(7) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 5 GRADE GS12
(8) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 46 GRADE GS11
(9) G223C DFA OCSE DIVISION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS10
(10) G226C DFA OCSE PROGRAM MANAGER 2 GRADE GS10
(11) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS09
(12) G224C DFA OCSE FIELD MANAGER 6 GRADE GS09
(13) G227C DFA OCSE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR 17 GRADE GS08
(14) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(15) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS08
(16) A081C AUDITOR 2 GRADE GS07
(17) M029C CHILD SUPPORT SUPERVISOR II 18 GRADE GS07
(18) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS07
(19) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(20) M052C CHILD SUPPORT SUPERVISOR I 54 GRADE GS06
(21) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS06
(22) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(23) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(24) E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR 3 GRADE GS06
(25) M067C CHILD SUPPORT COORDINATOR 12 GRADE GS05
(26) M068C CHILD SUPPORT SPECIALIST 279 GRADE GS05
(27) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 11 GRADE GS05
(28) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(29) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(30) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 63 GRADE GS04
(31) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 3 GRADE GS03
(32) C059C DFA SERVICE REPRESENTATIVE 230 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 775

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Finance and Administration - Child Support Enforcement for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: fifteen (15) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
01/07/2025 10:59:04 AM JAP005

HB1088
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable from the Child
Support Enforcement Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Finance and Administration - Child Support Enforcement for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $34,887,633
(02) EXTRA HELP 100,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 14,159,618
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 14,535,654
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 250,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) DATA PROCESSING AND EQUIPMENT EXPENSE 13,848,483
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $77,906,388

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. EXTRA
HELP EXEMPTION. Extra Help positions authorized herein are specifically
exempt from limitation of hours, either by act or regulation. Provided,
however, when a temporary or part-time employee is employed by the Department
of Finance and Administration - Office of Child Support Enforcement for a
period of time exceeding seven (7) months, a report of such shall be filed
with the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
01/07/2025 10:59:04 AM JAP005

HB1088
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.








01/07/2025 10:59:04 AM JAP005